North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 17. Conservation, Farmland, and Open Space Protection and Coordination. [Repealed]

§ 113A-240.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.230(a), (c), by Session Laws 2020-78, s. 8.4(a), effective July 1, 2020.

§ 113A-241.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-78, s. 8.4(c), effective July 1, 2020.

History.

2000-23, ss. 2, 3; 2001-452, s. 2.2; 2004-195, s. 2.3; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), repealed by 2020-78, s. 8.4(c), effective July 1, 2020.

§§ 113A-242 through 113A-250.

Reserved for future codification purposes.